Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3113
Creating High Impact Economic Futures Act, how cited.

Sections 77-3113 to 77-3120 shall be known and may be cited as the Creating High Impact Economic Futures Act and may also be referred to as the CHIEF Act.

Laws 1984, LB 372, § 1;

R.S.1943, (2022), § 13-201;

Laws 2024, LB1344, § 1.